Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1771
Supervisory committee; duties; audit.

(1) Unless the credit union has been audited by a certified public accountant, the supervisory committee shall make or cause to be made a comprehensive annual audit of the books and affairs of the credit union. It shall submit a report of each annual audit to the board of directors and a summary of that report to the members at the next annual meeting of the credit union.

(2) The supervisory committee shall make or cause to be made such supplementary audits, examinations, and verifications of members' accounts as it deems necessary or as are required by the director or the board of directors and shall submit reports of these supplementary audits to the board of directors.

(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the department for cause from requiring a credit union to obtain a qualified opinion audit conducted by a certified public accountant and paid for by the credit union.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 71.